California statutes. Penal Code
(j) A motion filed in a timely manner within the 180-day period may be heard within 30 days of the expiration of the 180-day period. The court may extend the 30-day period upon a showing of good cause. The motion may be made by the surety insurer, the bail agent, the surety, or the depositor of money or property, any of whom may appear in person or through an attorney.

(k) In addition to any other notice required by law, the moving party shall give the prosecuting agency a written notice at least 10 court days before a hearing held pursuant to subdivision (f), (g), or (j), as a condition precedent to granting the
 motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 79, Sec. 1.   (AB 2655)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1305.1.

If the defendant fails to appear for arraignment, trial, judgment, or upon any other occasion when his or her appearance is lawfully required, but the court has reason to believe that sufficient excuse may exist for the failure to appear, the court may continue the case for a period it deems reasonable to enable the defendant to appear without ordering a forfeiture of bail or issuing a bench warrant.

If, after the court has made the order, the defendant, without sufficient excuse, fails to appear on or before the continuance date set by the court, the bail shall be forfeited and a warrant for the defendant’s arrest may be ordered issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 524, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1305.2.

If an assessment is made a condition of the order to set aside the forfeiture of an undertaking, deposit, or bail under Section 1305, the clerk of the court shall within 30 days mail notice thereof to the surety or depositor at the address of its principal office, mail a copy to the bail agent whose name appears on the bond, and shall execute a certificate of mailing and place it in the court’s file in the case. The time limit for payment shall in no event be less than 30 days after the date of mailing of the notice.

If the assessment has not been paid by the date specified, the court shall determine if a certificate of mailing has been executed, and if none has, the court shall cause a notice to be mailed to the surety, depositor, or bail agent whose name appears on the bond, and the surety, depositor, or bail agent whose name appears on the bond shall be allowed an additional 30 days to pay the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 56, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1305.3.

The district attorney, county counsel, or applicable prosecuting agency, as the case may be, shall recover, out of the forfeited bail money, the costs and attorney’s fees incurred in successfully opposing a motion to vacate the forfeiture and in collecting on the summary judgment prior to the division of the forfeited bail money between the cities and counties in accordance with Section 1463.001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   (AB 1854)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1305.4.

Notwithstanding Section 1305, the surety insurer, the bail agent, the surety, or the depositor may file a motion, based upon good cause, for an order extending the 180-day period provided in that section. The motion shall include a declaration or affidavit that states the reasons showing good cause to extend that period. The court, upon a hearing and a showing of good cause, may order the period extended to a time not exceeding 180 days from its order. A motion may be filed and calendared as provided in subdivision (j) of Section 1305. In addition to any other notice required by law, the moving party shall give the prosecuting agency a written notice at least 10 court days before a hearing held pursuant to this section as a condition precedent to granting the motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 59, Sec. 6.   (SB 514)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1305.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 85, 580, 904.1, and 904.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the following rules apply to an appeal from an order of the superior court on a motion to vacate a bail forfeiture declared under Section 1305:

(a) If the amount in controversy exceeds thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), the appeal is to the court of appeal and shall be treated as an unlimited civil case.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the amount in controversy does not exceed
 thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), the appeal is to the appellate division of the superior court and shall be treated as a limited civil case.

(c) If the bail forfeiture was in a felony case, or in a case in which both a felony and a misdemeanor were charged, and the forfeiture occurred at or after the sentencing hearing or after the indictment or the legal commitment by a magistrate, the appeal is to the court of appeal and shall be treated as an unlimited civil case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 861, Sec. 14.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1305.6.

(a) If a person appears in court after the end of the 180-day period specified in Section 1305, the court may, in its discretion, vacate the forfeiture and exonerate the bond if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The person was arrested on the same case within the county where the case is located, within the 180-day period.

(2) The person has been in continuous custody from the time of his or her arrest until the
 court appearance on that case.

(b) Upon a showing of good cause, a motion brought pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 1305 may be filed within 20 days from the mailing of the notice of entry of judgment
 under Section 1306.

(c) In addition to any other notice required by law, the moving party shall give the applicable prosecuting agency written notice of the motion to vacate the forfeiture and exonerate the bond under this section at least 10 court days before the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 812, Sec. 1.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1306.

(a) When any bond is forfeited and the period of time specified in Section 1305 has elapsed without the forfeiture having been set aside, the court which has declared the forfeiture shall enter a summary judgment against each bondsman named in the bond in the amount for which the bondsman is bound. The judgment shall be the amount of the bond plus costs, and notwithstanding any other law, no penalty assessments shall be levied or added to the judgment.

(b) If a court grants relief from bail forfeiture, it shall impose a monetary payment as a condition of relief to compensate the people for the costs of returning a defendant to custody pursuant to Section 1305, except for cases where
 the court determines that in the best interest of justice no costs should be imposed. The amount imposed shall reflect the actual costs of returning the defendant to custody. Failure to act within the required time to make the payment imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall not be the basis for a summary judgment against any or all of the underlying amount of the bail. A summary judgment entered for failure to make the payment imposed under this subdivision is subject to the provisions of Section 1308, and shall apply only to the amount of the costs owing at the time the summary judgment is entered, plus administrative costs and interest.

(c) If, because of the failure of any court to promptly perform the duties enjoined upon it pursuant to this section, summary judgment is not entered within 90 days after the date upon which it may first be entered, the right to do so expires and the bail is exonerated.

(d) A dismissal of the complaint, indictment, or information after the default of the defendant shall not release or affect the obligation of the bail bond or undertaking.

(e) The district attorney or county counsel shall:

(1) Demand immediate payment of the judgment within 30 days after the summary judgment becomes final.

(2) If the judgment remains unpaid for a period of 20 days after demand has been made, shall forthwith enforce the judgment in the manner provided for enforcement of money judgments generally. If the judgment is appealed by the surety or bondsman, the undertaking required to be given in these cases shall be provided by a surety other than the one filing the appeal. The undertaking shall comply with the enforcement requirements of Section
 917.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Notwithstanding Sections 85, 580, 904.1, and 904.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, jurisdiction of the appeal, and treatment of the appeal as a limited civil case or an unlimited civil case, is governed by Section 1305.5.

(f) The right to enforce a summary judgment entered against a bondsman pursuant to this section shall expire two years after the entry of the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 470, Sec. 50.   (AB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1306.1.

The provisions of Sections 1305 and 1306 shall not affect the payment of bail deposits into the city or county treasury, as the case may be, pursuant to Section 40512 of the Vehicle Code in those cases arising under Section 40500 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1926.)
-------------------------------------------

1307.

If, by reason of the neglect of the defendant to appear, money deposited instead of bail is forfeited, and the forfeiture is not discharged or remitted, the clerk with whom it is deposited must, at the end of 180 days, unless the court has before that time discharged the forfeiture, pay over the money deposited to the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1926.)
-------------------------------------------

1308.

(a) No court or magistrate shall accept any person or corporation as surety on bail if any summary judgment against that person or corporation entered pursuant to Section 1306 remains unpaid after the expiration of 30 days after service of the notice of the entry of the summary judgment, provided that, if during the 30 days an action or proceeding available at law is initiated to determine the validity of the order of forfeiture or summary judgment rendered on it, this section shall be rendered inoperative until that action or proceeding has finally been determined, provided that, if an appeal is taken, an appeal bond is posted in compliance with Section 917.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) The clerk of the court in which the judgment is rendered shall serve notice of the entry of judgment upon the judgment debtor within five days after the date of the entry of the summary judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 570, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Inapplicable as prescribed in subd. (a).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Recommitment of the Defendant, After Having Given Bail or Deposited Money Instead of Bail [1310. - 1317.]

1310.

The court to which the committing magistrate returns the depositions, or in which an indictment, information, or appeal is pending, or to which a judgment on appeal is remitted to be carried into effect, may, by an order entered upon its minutes, direct the arrest of the defendant and his or her commitment to the officer to whose custody he or she was committed at the time of giving bail, and his or her detention until legally discharged, in the following cases:

(a) When, by reason of his or her failure to appear, he or she has incurred a forfeiture of his or her bail, or of money deposited instead thereof.

(b) When it satisfactorily appears to the court that his or her bail, or either of them, are dead or insufficient, or have removed from the state.

(c) Upon an indictment being found or information filed in the cases provided in Section 985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 85.)
-------------------------------------------

1311.

The order for the recommitment of the defendant must recite generally the facts upon which it is founded, and direct that the defendant be arrested by any sheriff, marshal, or policeman in this state, and committed to the officer in whose custody he or she was at the time he or she was admitted to bail, to be detained until legally discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1312.

The defendant may be arrested pursuant to the order, upon a certified copy thereof, in any county, in the same manner as upon a warrant of arrest, except that when arrested in another county the order need not be indorsed by a magistrate of that county.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1313.

If the order recites, as the ground upon which it is made, the failure of the defendant to appear for judgment upon conviction, the defendant must be committed according to the requirement of the order.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1314.

If the order be made for any other cause, and the offense is bailable, the Court may fix the amount of bail, and may cause a direction to be inserted in the order that the defendant be admitted to bail in the sum fixed, which must be specified in the order.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1315.

When the defendant is admitted to bail, the bail may be taken by any magistrate in the county, having authority in a similar case to admit to bail, upon the holding of the defendant to answer before an indictment, or by any other magistrate designated by the Court.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1316.

When bail is taken upon the recommitment of the defendant, the undertaking must be in substantially the following form:

An order having been made on the ____ day of ____, A.D. eighteen ____, by the Court (naming it), that A.B. be admitted to bail in the sum of ____ dollars, in an action pending in that Court against him in behalf of the people of the State of California, upon an (information, presentment, indictment, or appeal, as the case may be), we, C.D. and E.F., of (stating their places of residence and occupation), hereby undertake that the above named A.B. will appear in that or any other Court in which his appearance may be lawfully required upon that (information, presentment, indictment, or appeal, as the case may be), and will at all times render himself amenable to its orders and process, and appear for judgment and surrender himself in execution thereof; or if he fails to perform either of these conditions, that we will pay to the people of the State of California the sum of ____ dollars (insert the sum in which the defendant is admitted to bail).

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1317.

The bail must possess the qualifications, and must be put in, in all respects, in the manner prescribed in Article II of this Chapter.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Procedure Relating to Release on Own Recognizance [1318. - 1319.5.]

1318.

(a) The defendant shall not be released from custody under an own recognizance until the defendant files with the clerk of the court or other person authorized to accept bail a signed release agreement which includes:

(1) The defendant’s promise to appear at all times and places, as ordered by the court or magistrate and as ordered by any court in which, or any magistrate before whom the charge is subsequently pending.

(2) The defendant’s promise to obey all reasonable conditions imposed by the court or magistrate.

(3) The defendant’s promise not to depart this state without leave of the court.

(4) Agreement by the defendant to waive extradition if the defendant fails to appear as required and is apprehended outside of the State of California.

(5) The acknowledgment of the defendant that he or she has been informed of the consequences and penalties applicable to violation of the conditions of release.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1432) by Stats. 1988, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1318.1.

(a) A court, with the concurrence of the board of supervisors, may employ an investigative staff for the purpose of recommending whether a defendant should be released on his or her own recognizance.

(b) Whenever a court has employed an investigative staff pursuant to subdivision (a), an investigative report shall be prepared in all cases involving a violent felony, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, or a felony in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 23153 of the Vehicle Code, recommending whether the defendant should be released on his or her own recognizance. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) Written verification of any outstanding warrants against the defendant.

(2) Written verification of any prior incidents where the defendant has failed to make a court appearance.

(3) Written verification of the criminal record of the defendant.

(4) Written verification of the residence of the defendant during the past year.

After the report is certified pursuant to this subdivision, it shall be submitted to the court for review, prior to a hearing held pursuant to Section 1319.

(c) The salaries of the staff are a proper charge against the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1009, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1319.

(a) No person arrested for a violent felony, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, may be released on his or her own recognizance until a hearing is held in open court before the magistrate or judge, and until the prosecuting attorney is given notice and a reasonable opportunity to be heard on the matter. In all cases, these provisions shall be implemented in a manner consistent with the defendant’s right to be taken before a magistrate or judge without unreasonable delay pursuant to Section 825.

(b) A defendant charged with a violent felony, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, shall not be released on his or her own recognizance where it appears, by clear and convincing evidence, that he or she previously has been charged with a felony offense and has willfully and without excuse from the court failed to appear in court as required while that charge was pending. In all other cases, in making the determination as to whether or not to grant release under this section, the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The existence of any outstanding felony warrants on the defendant.

(2) Any other information presented in the report prepared pursuant to Section 1318.1. The fact that the court has not received the report required by Section 1318.1, at the time of the hearing to decide whether to release the defendant on his or her own recognizance, shall not preclude that release.

(3) Any other information presented by the prosecuting attorney.

(c) The judge or magistrate who, pursuant to this section, grants or denies release on a person’s own recognizance, within the time period prescribed in Section 825, shall state the reasons for that decision in the record. This statement shall be included in the court’s minutes. The report prepared by the investigative staff pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1318.1 shall be placed in the court file for that particular matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1009, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1319.5.

(a) A person described in subdivision (b) who is arrested for a new offense shall not be released on his or her own recognizance until a hearing is held in open court before the magistrate or judge.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to the following:

(1) Any person who is currently on felony probation or felony parole.

(2) Any person who has failed to appear in court as ordered, resulting in a warrant being issued, three or more times over the three
 years preceding the current arrest, except for infractions arising from violations of the Vehicle Code, and who is arrested for any of the following offenses: 

(A) Any violation of the California Street Terrorism Enforcement and Prevention Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 186.20) of Title 7 of Part 1).

(B) Any violation of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 240) of Title 8 of Part 1 (assault and battery). 

(C) A violation of Section 459 (residential burglary).

(D) Any offense in which the defendant is alleged to have been armed with or to have personally used a firearm.

(E) Any
 offense involving domestic violence.

(F) Any offense in which the defendant is alleged to have caused great bodily injury to another person.

(G) Any other felony offense not described in subparagraphs (A) through (F), inclusive, unless the person is released pursuant to a court-operated pretrial release program or a pretrial release program with approval by the court, in which case subdivision (a) shall not apply.

(c) This section does not change the requirement under Section 1270.1 to hold a hearing in open court before the magistrate or judge in cases in which the person has been arrested for an offense specified in that section.

(d) This section does not alter or
 diminish the rights conferred under Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution (Marsy’s Law).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 554, Sec. 1.   (AB 789)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Violations [1320. - 1320.5.]

1320.

(a) Every person who is charged with or convicted of the commission of a misdemeanor who is released from custody on his or her own recognizance and who in order to evade the process of the court willfully fails to appear as required, is guilty of a misdemeanor. It shall be presumed that a defendant who willfully fails to appear within 14 days of the date assigned for his or her appearance intended to evade the process of the court.

(b) Every person who is charged with or convicted of the commission of a felony who is released from custody on his or her own recognizance and who in order to evade the process of the court willfully fails to appear as required, is guilty of a felony, and
 upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. It shall be presumed that a defendant who willfully fails to appear within 14 days of the date assigned for his or her appearance intended to evade the process of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 459.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1320.5.

Every person who is charged with or convicted of the commission of a felony, who is released from custody on bail, and who in order to evade the process of the court willfully fails to appear as required, is guilty of a felony. Upon a conviction under this section, the person shall be punished by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment. Willful failure to appear within 14 days of the date assigned for appearance may be found to have been for the purpose of evading the process of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 460.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.7. Pretrial Risk Assessment Tool Validation [1320.35. - 1320.35.]

1320.35.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to understand and reduce biases based on gender, income level, race, or ethnicity in pretrial release decisionmaking.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Pretrial risk assessment tool” means an instrument used to determine the risks associated with individuals in the pretrial context.

(2) “Pretrial services agency” means a local public agency that elects to perform pretrial risk assessments on individuals and provides the assessment information to a court.

(3) “Release conditions framework” means the guidelines used by the pretrial services agency and the court to categorize varying degrees of risk for purposes of recommending whether to release or detain a person, whether to impose pretrial release conditions on a person, and guidance regarding those conditions.

(4) “Validate” means using scientifically accepted methods to measure both of the following:

(A) The accuracy and reliability of the risk assessment tool in assessing (i) the risk that an assessed person will fail to appear in court as required and (ii) the risk to public safety due to the commission of a new criminal offense if the person is released before the
 adjudication of the current criminal offense for which they have been charged.

(B) Any disparate effect or bias in the risk assessment tool based on gender, race, or ethnicity.

(c) (1) Any pretrial risk assessment tool used by a pretrial services agency shall be validated by
 July 1, 2021, and on a regular basis thereafter, but no less frequently than once every three years. A pretrial services agency may coordinate with the Judicial Council to validate a pretrial risk assessment tool.

(2) A pretrial risk assessment tool shall be validated using the most recent data collected by the pretrial services agency within its jurisdiction, or, if that data is unavailable, using the most recent data collected by a pretrial services agency in a similar jurisdiction within California.

(d) (1) In order to increase transparency, a pretrial services agency shall, with regard to a pretrial risk assessment tool that it utilizes, make the following information publicly available:

(A) Line items, scoring, and weighting, as well as details on
 how each line item is scored, for each pretrial risk assessment tool that the agency uses.

(B) Validation studies for each pretrial risk assessment tool that the agency uses.

(2) A pretrial services agency shall, when selecting which pretrial risk assessment tool to utilize, ensure that the agency would be able to comply with paragraph (1) if that tool was selected.

(e) The Judicial Council shall maintain a list of pretrial services agencies that have satisfied the validation requirement described in subdivision (c) and complied with the transparency requirements described in subdivision (d).

(f) Beginning on or before
 June 30, 2021, and on or before
 June 30 of each year thereafter, the Judicial Council shall publish on its internet website a report with data related to outcomes and potential biases in pretrial release. The report shall, at a minimum, include:

(1) The following information on each county pretrial release program:

(A) The name of the pretrial risk assessment tool that is used to inform release decisions by the court.

(B) The release conditions framework used in the county.

(C) Whether a pretrial services agency is conducting interviews as part of the risk assessment.

(2) The following information by superior court in large and medium courts and otherwise aggregated by superior
 court size:

(A) Rates of release granted prearraignment and rates of release granted pretrial, aggregated by gender, race or ethnicity, ZIP Code of residency and offense type.

(B) The percent of released individuals who make their required court appearances, aggregated by offense type and whether they were released on bail or pursuant to a risk assessment. For those released pursuant to a risk assessment, this information shall be aggregated by risk level.

(C) The percent of released individuals who are not charged with a new offense during the pretrial stage, aggregated by offense type and whether they were released on bail or pursuant to a risk assessment. For those released pursuant to a risk assessment, this information shall be aggregated by risk level.

(D) The number of assessed individuals by age, ZIP Code of residency, gender, and race or ethnicity.

(E) The number of assessed individuals by risk level, ZIP Code of residency, booking charge level, and release decision.

(F) The number and percentage of assessed individuals who receive pretrial supervision by level of supervision.

(G) The number and percentage of assessed individuals, by supervision level, who fail to appear in court as required, are arrested for a new offense during the pretrial period, or have pretrial release revoked.

(3) The following information on each risk assessment tool:

(A) The percent of released individuals who attend all of their required court
 appearances and are not charged with a new offense during the pretrial stage, aggregated by risk level.

(B) Risk levels aggregated by race or ethnicity, gender, offense type, ZIP Code of residency, and release or detention decision.

(C) The predictive accuracy of the tool by gender, race or ethnicity, and offense type.

(D) The proportion of cases in which the release or detention recommendation derived from the risk assessment is different than the release or detention decision imposed by the judicial officer.

(4) If feasible, the Judicial Council shall provide information on any disparate effect in the tools based on income level.

(g) (1) Pretrial services agencies
 and courts shall provide the Judicial Council the requisite data, as determined by the Judicial Council, to meet the requirements of this section.

(2) The Department of Justice shall work with the Judicial Council to provide the data necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section.

(3) The Judicial Council shall not share any individual-level data with any outside entity unless it has entered into a contract for research purposes with the entity and privacy protections are established to anonymize the data.

(h) The requirements of subdivisions (f) and (g) shall apply to pretrial services agencies that perform risk assessments pursuant to a contractual agreement with the courts, including all of the following:

(1) Agencies funded pursuant to the
 Budget Act of 2019 as pretrial pilot projects.

(2) Agencies otherwise funded by the state to perform risk assessments.

(3) Other agencies that perform risk assessments as long as sufficient funding is provided to the Judicial Council, the superior courts, and pretrial services agencies to ensure their ability to meet the data reporting requirements and standards set by the Judicial Council.

(i) (1) By January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall provide a report to the courts and the Legislature containing recommendations to mitigate bias and disparate effect in pretrial decisionmaking.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 42.   (AB 3364)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Who May Be Witnesses in Criminal Actions [1321. - 1324.2.]

1321.

The rules for determining the competency of witnesses in civil actions are applicable also to criminal actions and proceedings, except as otherwise provided in this Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1324.

In any felony proceeding or in any investigation or proceeding before a grand jury for any felony offense if a person refuses to answer a question or produce evidence of any other kind on the ground that he or she may be incriminated thereby, and if the district attorney of the county or any other prosecuting agency in writing requests the court, in and for that county, to order that person to answer the question or produce the evidence, a judge shall set a time for hearing and order the person to appear before the court and show cause, if any, why the question should not be answered or the evidence produced, and the court shall order the question answered or the evidence produced unless it finds that to do so would be clearly contrary to the public interest, or could subject the witness to a criminal prosecution in another jurisdiction, and that person shall comply with the order. After complying, and if, but for this section, he or she would have been privileged to withhold the answer given or the evidence produced by him or her, no testimony or other information compelled under the order or any information directly or indirectly derived from the testimony or other information may be used against the witness in any criminal case. But he or she may nevertheless be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing or contempt committed in answering, or failing to answer, or in producing, or failing to produce, evidence in accordance with the order. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the district attorney or any other prosecuting agency from requesting an order granting use immunity or transactional immunity to a witness compelled to give testimony or produce evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1324.1.

In any misdemeanor proceeding in any court, if a person refuses to answer a question or produce evidence of any other kind on the ground that he may be incriminated thereby, the person may agree in writing with the district attorney of the county, or the prosecuting attorney of a city, as the case may be, to testify voluntarily pursuant to this section. Upon written request of such district attorney, or prosecuting attorney, the court having jursidiction of the proceeding shall approve such written agreement, unless the court finds that to do so would be clearly contrary to the public interest. If, after court approval of such agreement, and if, but for this section, the person would have been privileged to withhold the answer given or the evidence produced by him, that person shall not be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any fact or act concerning which, in accordance with such agreement, he answered or produced evidence, but he may, nevertheless, be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing or contempt committed in answering or in producing evidence in accordance with such agreement. If such person fails to give any answer or to produce any evidence in accordance with such agreement, that person shall be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture in the same manner and to the same extent as he would be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture but for this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 528.)
-------------------------------------------

1324.2.

(a) Testimony of a victim or witness in a felony prosecution for a violation or attempted violation of Section 220, 243.4, 261, 261.5, 286, 287, 288, or 289, that states that the victim or witness, at or around the time of the violation or attempted violation, unlawfully possessed or used a controlled substance or alcohol is inadmissible in a separate prosecution of that victim or witness to prove illegal possession or use of that controlled substance or alcohol.

(b) Evidence that the testifying witness
 unlawfully possessed or used a controlled substance or alcohol is not excluded in the felony prosecution of a violation or attempted violation of Section 220, 243.4, 261, 261.5, 286, 287, 288, or 289.

(c) Evidence that a witness received use immunity for testimony pursuant to subdivision (a) is not excluded in the felony prosecution of a violation or attempted violation of Section 220, 243.4, 261, 261.5, 286, 287, 288, or 289.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (AB 1927)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Compelling the Attendance of Witnesses [1326. - 1332.]

1326.

(a) The process by which the attendance of a witness before a court or magistrate is required is a subpoena. It may be signed and issued by any of the following:

(1) A magistrate before whom a complaint is laid or their clerk, the district attorney or their investigator, or the public defender or their investigator, for witnesses in the state.

(2) The district attorney, their investigator, or, upon request of the grand jury, any judge of the superior court, for witnesses in the state, in support of an indictment or information, to appear before the court in which it is to be tried.

(3) The district attorney or their investigator, the
 public defender or their investigator, or the clerk of the court in which a criminal action is to be tried. The clerk shall, at any time, upon application of the defendant, and without charge, issue as many blank subpoenas, subscribed by them, for witnesses in the state, as the defendant may require.

(4) The attorney of record for the defendant.

(b) A subpoena issued in a criminal action that commands the custodian of records or other qualified witness of a business to produce books, papers, documents, or records shall direct that those items be delivered by the custodian or qualified witness in the manner specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1560 of the Evidence Code. Subdivision (e) of Section 1560 of the Evidence Code shall not apply to criminal cases.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision
 (b), a provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor shall not release medical information related to an individual seeking or obtaining gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care or a person or entity allowing a child to receive gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care in response to any foreign subpoena that is based on a violation of another state’s laws authorizing a criminal action that interferes with an individual’s rights to seek or obtain gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care or against a person or entity that allows a child to receive gender-affirming health care or gender-affirming mental health care.

(2) For the purpose of this subdivision, “gender-affirming health care” and “gender-affirming mental health care” shall have the same meanings as provided in Section 16010.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a provider of health care, health care service plan, or contractor shall not release medical information related to sensitive services in response to any foreign subpoena that is based on a violation of another state’s laws authorizing a criminal action against a person or entity for the provision or receipt of legally protected health care activity, as defined in Section 1798.300 of the Civil Code. For purposes of this subdivision, “sensitive services” has the same meaning as defined in Section 791.02 of the Insurance Code.

(e) In a criminal action, no party, or attorney or representative of a party, may issue a subpoena commanding the custodian of records or other qualified witness of a business to provide books, papers, documents, or records, or copies thereof, relating to a person or entity other than the subpoenaed person or entity in any